SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0209 Y 31
SFX 0209 ra jer ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjacy ..
SFX 0209 ra jerje ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjemoj ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjemy ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjetaj ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjetej ..
SFX 0209 ra jerjeće ..
SFX 0209 ra jerješ ..
SFX 0209 ra jermoj ..
SFX 0209 ra jermy ..
SFX 0209 ra jertaj ..
SFX 0209 ra jertej ..
SFX 0209 ra jeru ..
SFX 0209 ra jerće ..
SFX 0209 ra rach ..
SFX 0209 ra rachmoj ..
SFX 0209 ra rachmy ..
SFX 0209 ra rachu ..
SFX 0209 ra rali ..
SFX 0209 ra ranje ..
SFX 0209 ra rany ..
SFX 0209 ra rać ..
SFX 0209 ra rał ..
SFX 0209 ra rała ..
SFX 0209 ra rałe ..
SFX 0209 ra rało ..
SFX 0209 ra rałoj ..
SFX 0209 ra raštaj ..
SFX 0209 ra raštej ..
SFX 0209 ra rašće ..

SFX 0210 Y 29
SFX 0210 a ach .
SFX 0210 a achmoj .
SFX 0210 a achmy .
SFX 0210 a achu .
SFX 0210 a acy .
SFX 0210 a am .
SFX 0210 a amoj .
SFX 0210 a amy .
SFX 0210 a any .
SFX 0210 a ataj .
SFX 0210 a atej .
SFX 0210 a ał .
SFX 0210 a ała .
SFX 0210 a ało .
SFX 0210 a ałoj .
SFX 0210 a ej .
SFX 0210 a eja .
SFX 0210 a ejtaj .
SFX 0210 a ejtej .
SFX 0210 a ejće .
SFX 0210 a eli .
SFX 0210 a enje .
SFX 0210 a eć .
SFX 0210 a eće .
SFX 0210 a eš .
SFX 0210 a eše .
SFX 0210 a eštaj .
SFX 0210 a eštej .
SFX 0210 a ešće .

SFX 0211 Y 28
SFX 0211 y udu .
SFX 0211 y udź .
SFX 0211 y udźe .
SFX 0211 y udźemoj .
SFX 0211 y udźemy .
SFX 0211 y udźetaj .
SFX 0211 y udźetej .
SFX 0211 y udźeće .
SFX 0211 y udźeš .
SFX 0211 y udźtaj .
SFX 0211 y udźtej .
SFX 0211 y udźće .
SFX 0211 y ych .
SFX 0211 y ychmoj .
SFX 0211 y ychmy .
SFX 0211 y ychu .
SFX 0211 y yli .
SFX 0211 y yty .
SFX 0211 y yć .
SFX 0211 y yće .
SFX 0211 y ył .
SFX 0211 y yła .
SFX 0211 y yłe .
SFX 0211 y yło .
SFX 0211 y yłoj .
SFX 0211 y yštaj .
SFX 0211 y yštej .
SFX 0211 y yšće .

SFX 0212 Y 29
SFX 0212 0 a .
SFX 0212 0 acy .
SFX 0212 0 enje .
SFX 0212 0 eny .
SFX 0212 0 i .
SFX 0212 0 ich .
SFX 0212 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0212 0 ichmy .
SFX 0212 0 ichu .
SFX 0212 0 ili .
SFX 0212 0 imoj .
SFX 0212 0 imy .
SFX 0212 0 itaj .
SFX 0212 0 itej .
SFX 0212 0 ić .
SFX 0212 0 iće .
SFX 0212 0 ił .
SFX 0212 0 iła .
SFX 0212 0 iło .
SFX 0212 0 iłoj .
SFX 0212 0 iš .
SFX 0212 0 ištaj .
SFX 0212 0 ištej .
SFX 0212 0 išće .
SFX 0212 0 my .
SFX 0212 0 taj .
SFX 0212 0 tej .
SFX 0212 0 u .
SFX 0212 0 će .

SFX 0213 Y 28
SFX 0213 0 ch .
SFX 0213 0 chmoj .
SFX 0213 0 chmy .
SFX 0213 0 chu .
SFX 0213 0 cy .
SFX 0213 0 j .
SFX 0213 0 ja .
SFX 0213 0 jtaj .
SFX 0213 0 jtej .
SFX 0213 0 jće .
SFX 0213 0 li .
SFX 0213 0 m .
SFX 0213 0 moj .
SFX 0213 0 my .
SFX 0213 0 nje .
SFX 0213 0 ny .
SFX 0213 0 taj .
SFX 0213 0 tej .
SFX 0213 0 ć .
SFX 0213 0 će .
SFX 0213 0 ł .
SFX 0213 0 ła .
SFX 0213 0 ło .
SFX 0213 0 łoj .
SFX 0213 0 š .
SFX 0213 0 štaj .
SFX 0213 0 štej .
SFX 0213 0 šće .

SFX 0214 Y 29
SFX 0214 ń ni .
SFX 0214 ń nich .
SFX 0214 ń nichmoj .
SFX 0214 ń nichmy .
SFX 0214 ń nichu .
SFX 0214 ń nili .
SFX 0214 ń nimoj .
SFX 0214 ń nimy .
SFX 0214 ń nitaj .
SFX 0214 ń nitej .
SFX 0214 ń nić .
SFX 0214 ń niće .
SFX 0214 ń nił .
SFX 0214 ń niła .
SFX 0214 ń niło .
SFX 0214 ń niłoj .
SFX 0214 ń niš .
SFX 0214 ń ništaj .
SFX 0214 ń ništej .
SFX 0214 ń nišće .
SFX 0214 ń nja .
SFX 0214 ń njacy .
SFX 0214 ń njenje .
SFX 0214 ń njeny .
SFX 0214 ń nju .
SFX 0214 ń ńmy .
SFX 0214 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0214 ń ńtej .
SFX 0214 ń ńće .

SFX 0215 Y 28
SFX 0215 ehń ahnje ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnjemoj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnjemy ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnjetaj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnjetej ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnjeće ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnu ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahny ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnych ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnychmoj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnychmy ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnychu ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyli ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyć ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnył ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyła ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyło ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyłoj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyštaj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyštej ...
SFX 0215 ehń ahnyšće ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehnjacy ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehnjenje ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehnjeny ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehnješ ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehńtaj ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehńtej ...
SFX 0215 ehń ehńće ...

SFX 0216 Y 29
SFX 0216 0 ch .
SFX 0216 0 chmoj .
SFX 0216 0 chmy .
SFX 0216 0 chu .
SFX 0216 0 dźa .
SFX 0216 0 j .
SFX 0216 0 ja .
SFX 0216 0 jtaj .
SFX 0216 0 jtej .
SFX 0216 0 jće .
SFX 0216 0 li .
SFX 0216 0 m .
SFX 0216 0 moj .
SFX 0216 0 my .
SFX 0216 0 taj .
SFX 0216 0 tej .
SFX 0216 0 ty .
SFX 0216 0 wši .
SFX 0216 0 ć .
SFX 0216 0 će .
SFX 0216 0 ł .
SFX 0216 0 ła .
SFX 0216 0 łe .
SFX 0216 0 ło .
SFX 0216 0 łoj .
SFX 0216 0 š .
SFX 0216 0 štaj .
SFX 0216 0 štej .
SFX 0216 0 šće .

SFX 0217 Y 29
SFX 0217 š sy .
SFX 0217 š sych .
SFX 0217 š sychmoj .
SFX 0217 š sychmy .
SFX 0217 š sychu .
SFX 0217 š syli .
SFX 0217 š symoj .
SFX 0217 š symy .
SFX 0217 š sytaj .
SFX 0217 š sytej .
SFX 0217 š syć .
SFX 0217 š syće .
SFX 0217 š sył .
SFX 0217 š syła .
SFX 0217 š syło .
SFX 0217 š syłoj .
SFX 0217 š syš .
SFX 0217 š syštaj .
SFX 0217 š syštej .
SFX 0217 š syšće .
SFX 0217 š ša .
SFX 0217 š šacy .
SFX 0217 š šenje .
SFX 0217 š šeny .
SFX 0217 š šmy .
SFX 0217 š štaj .
SFX 0217 š štej .
SFX 0217 š šu .
SFX 0217 š šće .

SFX 0218 Y 11
SFX 0218 0 a .
SFX 0218 0 ach .
SFX 0218 0 aj .
SFX 0218 0 am .
SFX 0218 0 ami .
SFX 0218 0 ej .
SFX 0218 0 o .
SFX 0218 0 om .
SFX 0218 0 omaj .
SFX 0218 0 ow .
SFX 0218 0 y .

SFX 0219 Y 29
SFX 0219 hna hnach ...
SFX 0219 hna hnachmoj ...
SFX 0219 hna hnachmy ...
SFX 0219 hna hnachu ...
SFX 0219 hna hnali ...
SFX 0219 hna hnaty ...
SFX 0219 hna hnać ...
SFX 0219 hna hnaće ...
SFX 0219 hna hnał ...
SFX 0219 hna hnała ...
SFX 0219 hna hnałe ...
SFX 0219 hna hnało ...
SFX 0219 hna hnałoj ...
SFX 0219 hna hnaštaj ...
SFX 0219 hna hnaštej ...
SFX 0219 hna hnašće ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěr ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěri ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrimoj ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrimy ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěritaj ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěritej ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěriće ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěriš ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrja ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrju ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrtaj ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrtej ...
SFX 0219 hna ćěrće ...

SFX 0220 Y 29
SFX 0220 uj owa ..
SFX 0220 uj owach ..
SFX 0220 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0220 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0220 uj owachu ..
SFX 0220 uj owacy ..
SFX 0220 uj owali ..
SFX 0220 uj owanje ..
SFX 0220 uj owany ..
SFX 0220 uj ować ..
SFX 0220 uj ował ..
SFX 0220 uj owała ..
SFX 0220 uj owało ..
SFX 0220 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0220 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0220 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0220 uj owašće ..
SFX 0220 uj uja ..
SFX 0220 uj uje ..
SFX 0220 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0220 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0220 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0220 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0220 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0220 uj uješ ..
SFX 0220 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0220 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0220 uj uju ..
SFX 0220 uj ujće ..

SFX 0221 Y 28
SFX 0221 a ach .
SFX 0221 a achmoj .
SFX 0221 a achmy .
SFX 0221 a achu .
SFX 0221 a acy .
SFX 0221 a am .
SFX 0221 a amoj .
SFX 0221 a amy .
SFX 0221 a any .
SFX 0221 a ataj .
SFX 0221 a atej .
SFX 0221 a ał .
SFX 0221 a ała .
SFX 0221 a ało .
SFX 0221 a ałoj .
SFX 0221 a ej .
SFX 0221 a eja .
SFX 0221 a ejtaj .
SFX 0221 a ejtej .
SFX 0221 a ejće .
SFX 0221 a eli .
SFX 0221 a enje .
SFX 0221 a eć .
SFX 0221 a eće .
SFX 0221 a eš .
SFX 0221 a eštaj .
SFX 0221 a eštej .
SFX 0221 a ešće .

SFX 0222 Y 28
SFX 0222 a ach .
SFX 0222 a achmoj .
SFX 0222 a achmy .
SFX 0222 a achu .
SFX 0222 a acy .
SFX 0222 a amoj .
SFX 0222 a amy .
SFX 0222 a any .
SFX 0222 a ataj .
SFX 0222 a atej .
SFX 0222 a ał .
SFX 0222 a ała .
SFX 0222 a ało .
SFX 0222 a ałoj .
SFX 0222 a ej .
SFX 0222 a eja .
SFX 0222 a ejtaj .
SFX 0222 a ejtej .
SFX 0222 a ejće .
SFX 0222 a eli .
SFX 0222 a enje .
SFX 0222 a eć .
SFX 0222 a eće .
SFX 0222 a eštaj .
SFX 0222 a eštej .
SFX 0222 a ešće .
SFX 0222 a mješ .
SFX 0222 a mu .
