SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Rozhlad/0218
dobra/0209
dohlad/0218
dohna/0219
doja/0222
donoš/0217
dowječerja/0221
dowopřija/0222
dwojorjad/0218
dypkorjad/0218
nabra/0209
naby/0211
nada/0216
nadycha/0213
nahlad/0218
nakónčkuj/0220
nalehń/0215
nalič/0212
naměša/0221
nanoš/0217
napjelń/0214
napohlad/0218
naporjad/0218
napušća/0210
narjad/0218
natruš/0217
natřěla/0221
našwika/0213
njedobra/0209
njedoby/0211
njedoda/0216
njedohaš/0217
njedohna/0219
njedoměša/0221
njedosehń/0215
njedoskorž/0212
njedosmja/0221
njedowobjeduj/0220
njedowotnoš/0217
njedowudospołń/0214
njedowěša/0221
njedoćehń/0215
njedočita/0213
njenabra/0209
njenaby/0211
njenada/0216
njenahromadźa/0210
njenapraša/0221
njenaproš/0217
njenarejuj/0220
njenaswjeć/0212
njenawječerja/0221
njenawora/0213
njenaćehń/0215
njepoby/0211
njepocygań/0214
njepoda/0216
njepoduš/0217
njepodźěla/0210
njepoja/0221
njeposkić/0212
njepostorka/0213
njepotruš/0217
njepowłóžnja/0210
njepozaby/0211
njepřebra/0209
njepředa/0216
njepředoby/0211
njepředspomń/0214
njepřehłosuj/0220
njepřemóž/0212
njepřeměša/0221
njepřepoda/0216
njepřeproš/0217
njepřepřehń/0215
njepřeswědča/0210
njepřesćehń/0215
njepřetrada/0213
njepřibra/0209
njepřiby/0211
njepřida/0216
njepřidoby/0211
njepřihna/0219
njepřiproš/0217
njepřipřehń/0215
njepřistorč/0212
njepřitwjerdźa/0210
njerjad/0218
njerozda/0216
njerozebra/0209
njerozehna/0219
njerozfórmań/0214
njerozhiba/0213
njerozhna/0219
njerozpja/0221
njerozpředa/0216
njerozraža/0210
njerozsehń/0215
njeroztruš/0217
njerozwjesel/0212
njerozškraba/0213
njesehń/0215
njesfanatizuj/0220
njeskapalń/0214
njeskonkretizuj/0220
njesposrědkuj/0220
njespowšitkownja/0210
njespoča/0221
njespřeměń/0214
njestraš/0212
njewobda/0216
njewobsehń/0215
njewobswěća/0210
njewobsylń/0214
njewobtřěla/0221
njewobćesa/0213
njewoda/0216
njewomučń/0214
njewomłóć/0212
njewopoja/0210
njewosymjeń/0214
njewotby/0211
njewotebra/0209
njewoteda/0216
njewotehna/0219
njewotpołoža/0210
njewotproš/0217
njewotpłuwa/0213
njewotpřehń/0215
njewotswěć/0212
njewotwěša/0221
njewotzwoń/0214
njewoćehń/0215
njewočisća/0210
njewubra/0209
njewubróń/0214
njewuda/0216
njewudoby/0211
njewuduš/0217
njewuhna/0219
njewuhraba/0213
njewulehń/0215
njewunuć/0212
njewupjelnja/0210
njewuplahuj/0220
njewupra/0209
njewupraša/0221
njewuproš/0217
njewuprózdń/0214
njewupředa/0216
njewupřehń/0215
njewuskaka/0213
njewusmehń/0215
njewuwodźa/0210
njewuwostaj/0212
njewuzda/0216
njewzda/0216
njezabra/0209
njezaby/0211
njezadań/0214
njezadoby/0211
njezaduš/0217
njezadźěła/0213
njezahna/0219
njezakrjuduj/0220
njezakukla/0210
njezanjerjedź/0212
njezapoda/0216
njezaprehń/0215
njezasehń/0215
njezasoń/0214
njezasypa/0213
njezawala/0210
njezawda/0216
njezawonja/0221
njezbratř/0212
njezby/0211
njezbědń/0214
njezdecimuj/0220
njezdoby/0211
njezebra/0209
njezehna/0219
njezezawěša/0221
njezezłama/0213
njezešrubuj/0220
njezhaš/0217
njezhotowja/0210
njezmocuj/0220
njeznjewólń/0214
njezrjaduj/0220
njezroznoš/0217
njezwobwěša/0221
njezwol/0212
njezwukorjenjuj/0220
njezwunoš/0217
njezwućehń/0215
njezwěsća/0210
njezłapa/0213
poby/0211
podhlad/0218
podměša/0221
podnaja/0222
podrjad/0218
pohlad/0218
poja/0222
poproš/0217
porjad/0218
porjeńš/0212
pozaby/0211
poznamjeń/0214
poškraba/0213
požohnuj/0220
přebra/0209
předa/0216
předoby/0211
přehlad/0218
překroč/0212
přemosća/0210
přenoš/0217
přepřehń/0215
přećehń/0215
přežwjenka/0213
přibra/0209
přiby/0211
přida/0216
přidoby/0211
přihna/0219
přisadź/0212
přićehń/0215
rozebra/0209
rozehna/0219
rozhlad/0218
rozhna/0219
rozmnoža/0210
rozmóra/0213
roznoš/0217
rozpředa/0216
rozrjad/0218
roztroj/0212
sciwilizuj/0220
scuń/0214
skoncentruj/0220
spasa/0213
spedagogizuj/0220
spowěša/0221
spřećel/0212
swětonahlad/0218
sćehń/0215
wobhlad/0218
wobhnadźa/0210
wobjasń/0214
wobrjad/0218
woda/0216
wolóž/0212
wopłata/0213
wostrózbń/0214
wotby/0211
wotebra/0209
wotehna/0219
wothaća/0210
wotnaja/0222
wotpohlad/0218
wotpřehń/0215
wotrjad/0218
wotserbšć/0212
wottruš/0217
wotwjaza/0213
woćehń/0215
wołahodń/0214
wubra/0209
wuda/0216
wudoby/0211
wudokonja/0221
wuhlad/0218
wuhna/0219
wuja/0222
wukrawja/0210
wukusa/0213
wumjenuj/0220
wumydl/0212
wupra/0209
wutruš/0217
wuwal/0212
wuwita/0213
wuzda/0216
wućehń/0215
wučiń/0214
zabra/0209
zaby/0211
zadoby/0211
zadomja/0210
zahna/0219
zakamjenjuj/0220
zapoda/0216
zarjad/0218
zaštapa/0213
zažehl/0212
zbasń/0214
zbubnuj/0220
zby/0211
zdoby/0211
zdźěla/0210
zebra/0209
zehna/0219
zepřeradźa/0221
zezhibuj/0220
zhaša/0221
zmištruj/0220
znjeměrń/0214
znoš/0217
zrewiduj/0220
zwočinja/0221
